Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB837.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6111.6. Limit on handgun purchases.(a) Purchase of handgun.--No person may purchase more than one handgun in this Commonwealth within a 30-day period.(b) Sale of handgun.--No person may sell or cause to be sold to a person in this Commonwealth more than one handgun within a 30-day period.(c) Exceptions.--This section shall not apply to the following:(1) A licensed firearm dealer.(2) A licensed firearm collector.123456789101112131415161718 (3) A law enforcement agency or an agency authorized to perform law enforcement duties.(4) State and local correctional facilities.(5) A private security company licensed to do business within this Commonwealth.(6) The purchase or sale of antique firearms.(7) A person whose handgun is stolen or irretrievably lost if:(i) the person provides the seller with an official copy of the police report of the lost or stolen handgun, or a summary of the report on a form provided by the Pennsylvania State Police;(ii) the police report or summary contains the name and address of the handgun owner, the description of the handgun, the location of the loss or theft, the date of the loss or theft and the date the loss or theft was reported to the law enforcement agency;(iii) the date of the loss or theft as reflected on the police report or summary occurred within 30 days of the person's attempt to replace the handgun; and(iv) the seller attaches an official copy of the police report or summary of the report to the original sales receipt or other document evidencing the original sale and retains the sales receipt or other document for the period prescribed by regulation of the Pennsylvania State Police.(d) Grading.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a person that is convicted of violating subsection (a) or (b) commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.20250HB0837PN0867 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A person that, after being sentenced under paragraph (1), is convicted of violating subsection (a) or (b) commits a felony of the third degree.(e) Disposition of fines collected.--A court imposing and collecting a fine for a violation of subsection (a) or (b) shall transfer the fines collected to the State Treasurer for deposit into the account.(f) Violence Prevention Account.--The Violence Prevention Account is established within the General Fund as a nonlapsing, restricted receipt account. Money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency exclusively for purposes of violence prevention, including youth education and activities designed to prevent violence and grants to law enforcement agencies for equipment and training designed to prevent gun-related injuries.(g) Notice.--A seller shall notify each prospective purchaser that the purchase of more than one handgun in a 30-day period is prohibited under this section and of the applicable penalties.(h) Handgun purchase history check.--In addition to any other duty prescribed by this section, a seller of a handgun shall request the Pennsylvania State Police to conduct a handgun purchase history check to investigate whether the prospective handgun purchaser is in compliance with this section. A handgun purchase history check shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures governing other background checks under this subchapter. A handgun purchase history check shall be conducted at the same time any criminal history, juvenile delinquency or mental health records check is required for a firearm purchase under this subchapter. Information related to a handgun purchase 20250HB0837PN0867 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided to the Pennsylvania State Police by a seller may be retained by the Pennsylvania State Police as necessary to monitor compliance with this section.(i) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the content clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Violence Prevention Account established under subsection (f)."Handgun." Either of the following:(1) A firearm that has a short stock and is designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand.(2) Any combination of parts from which a firearm described under paragraph (1) can be assembled." Licensed firearm collector. " A person who collects firearms and is licensed as a collector under 18 U.S.C. § 923 (relating to licensing)." Licensed firearm dealer. " A person who is licensed as a firearm dealer under 18 U.S.C. § 923 . " Purchase. " Does not include the exchange or replacement of a handgun by a seller for a handgun purchased from the seller by the same person seeking the exchange or replacement within the 30-day period immediately preceding the date of exchange or replacement.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0837PN0867 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324